test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
      võti+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: võtmeilegi
      võti+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: võtmeist
      võti+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: võtmeistki
      võti+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: võtmeis
      võti+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: võtmeiski
      võti+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: võtmeisse
      võti+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: võtmeissegi
      võti+N+Pl+Com: võtmetega
      võti+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: võtmetegagi
      võti+N+Pl+Abe: võtmeteta
      võti+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: võtmetetagi
      võti+N+Pl+Ess: võtmetena
      võti+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: võtmetenagi
      võti+N+Pl+Trm: võtmeteni
      võti+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: võtmetenigi
      võti+N+Pl+Tra: võtmeteks
      võti+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: võtmetekski
      võti+N+Pl+Abl: võtmetelt
      võti+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: võtmeteltki
      võti+N+Pl+Ade: võtmetel
      võti+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: võtmetelgi
      võti+N+Pl+All: võtmetele
      võti+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: võtmetelegi
      võti+N+Pl+Ela: võtmetest
      võti+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: võtmetestki
      võti+N+Pl+Ine: võtmetes
      võti+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: võtmeteski
      võti+N+Pl+Ill: võtmetesse
      võti+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: võtmetessegi
      võti+N+Pl+Gen: võtmete
      võti+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: võtmetegi
      äike+N+Sg+Par: äikest
      äike+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: äikestki
      äike+N+Sg+Com: äikesega
      äike+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: äikesegagi
      äike+N+Sg+Abe: äikeseta
      äike+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: äikesetagi
      äike+N+Sg+Ess: äikesena
      äike+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: äikesenagi
      äike+N+Sg+Trm: äikeseni
      äike+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: äikesenigi
      äike+N+Sg+Tra: äikeseks
      äike+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: äikesekski
      äike+N+Sg+Abl: äikeselt
      äike+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: äikeseltki
      äike+N+Sg+Ade: äikesel
      äike+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: äikeselgi
      äike+N+Sg+All: äikesele
      äike+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: äikeselegi
      äike+N+Sg+Ela: äikesest
      äike+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: äikesestki
      äike+N+Sg+Ine: äikeses
      äike+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: äikeseski
      äike+N+Sg+Gen: äikese
      äike+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: äikesegi
      äike+N+Pl+Nom: äikesed
      äike+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: äikesedki
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: äikeseiks
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikeseikski
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: äikeseilt
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikeseiltki
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: äikeseil
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikeseilgi
      äike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: äikeseile
      äike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikeseilegi
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: äikeseist
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikeseistki
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: äikeseis
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikeseiski
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: äikeseisse
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikeseissegi
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: äikesiks
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesikski
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: äikesilt
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesiltki
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: äikesil
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesilgi
      äike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: äikesile
      äike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesilegi
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: äikesist
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesistki
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: äikesis
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesiski
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: äikesisse
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesissegi
      äike+N+Pl+Com: äikestega
      äike+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: äikestegagi
      äike+N+Pl+Abe: äikesteta
      äike+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: äikestetagi
      äike+N+Pl+Ess: äikestena
      äike+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: äikestenagi
      äike+N+Pl+Trm: äikesteni
      äike+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: äikestenigi
      äike+N+Pl+Tra: äikesteks
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: äikestekski
      äike+N+Pl+Abl: äikestelt
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: äikesteltki
      äike+N+Pl+Ade: äikestel
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: äikestelgi
      äike+N+Pl+All: äikestele
      äike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: äikestelegi
      äike+N+Pl+Ela: äikestest
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: äikestestki
      äike+N+Pl+Ine: äikestes
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: äikesteski
      äike+N+Pl+Ill: äikestesse
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: äikestessegi
      äike+N+Pl+Gen: äikeste
      äike+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: äikestegi
      äike+N+Sg+Com+Use/Rare: äiksega
      äike+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksegagi
      äike+N+Sg+Abe+Use/Rare: äikseta
      äike+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetagi
      äike+N+Sg+Ess+Use/Rare: äiksena
      äike+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksenagi
      äike+N+Sg+Trm+Use/Rare: äikseni
      äike+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksenigi
      äike+N+Sg+Tra+Use/Rare: äikseks
      äike+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksekski
      äike+N+Sg+Abl+Use/Rare: äikselt
      äike+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseltki
      äike+N+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: äiksel
      äike+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikselgi
      äike+N+Sg+All+Use/Rare: äiksele
      äike+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikselegi
      äike+N+Sg+Ela+Use/Rare: äiksest
      äike+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksestki
      äike+N+Sg+Ine+Use/Rare: äikses
      äike+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseski
      äike+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksegi
      äike+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Rare: äikse
      äike+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksedki
      äike+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Rare: äiksed
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: äikseiks
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseikski
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: äikseilt
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseiltki
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: äikseil
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseilgi
      äike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: äikseile
      äike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseilegi
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: äikseist
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseistki
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: äikseis
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseiski
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: äikseisse
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseissegi
      äike+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: äiksetega
      äike+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetegagi
      äike+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: äikseteta
      äike+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetetagi
      äike+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: äiksetena
      äike+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetenagi
      äike+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: äikseteni
      äike+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetenigi
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: äikseteks
      äike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetekski
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: äiksetelt
      äike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseteltki
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: äiksetel
      äike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetelgi
      äike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: äiksetele
      äike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetelegi
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: äiksetest
      äike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetestki
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: äiksetes
      äike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseteski
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: äiksetesse
      äike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetessegi
      äike+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetegi
      äike+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: äiksete
      äike+N+Pl+Par: äikeseid
      äike+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: äikeseidki
      äike+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikesigi
      äike+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: äikesi
      äike+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikseidki
      äike+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: äikseid
      äike+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: äikesse
      äike+N+Sg+Ill: äikesesse
      äike+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: äikesessegi
      äike+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikessegi
      äike+N+Sg+Nom: äike
      äike+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: äikegi
      äike+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äikenegi
      äike+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Rare: äikene
      äike+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksetki
      äike+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: äikset
      äike+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: äiksessegi
      äike+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: äiksesse
      õlu+N+Sg+Com: õllega
      õlu+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: õllegagi
      õlu+N+Sg+Abe: õlleta
      õlu+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: õlletagi
      õlu+N+Sg+Ess: õllena
      õlu+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: õllenagi
      õlu+N+Sg+Trm: õlleni
      õlu+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: õllenigi
      õlu+N+Sg+Tra: õlleks
      õlu+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: õllekski
      õlu+N+Sg+Abl: õllelt
      õlu+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: õlleltki
      õlu+N+Sg+Ade: õllel
      õlu+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: õllelgi
      õlu+N+Sg+All: õllele
      õlu+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: õllelegi
      õlu+N+Sg+Ela: õllest
      õlu+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: õllestki
      õlu+N+Sg+Ine: õlles
      õlu+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: õlleski
      õlu+N+Sg+Gen: õlle
      õlu+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: õllegi
      õlu+N+Pl+Nom: õlled
      õlu+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: õlledki
      õlu+N+Pl+Com: õlledega
      õlu+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: õlledegagi
      õlu+N+Pl+Abe: õlledeta
      õlu+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: õlledetagi
      õlu+N+Pl+Ess: õlledena
      õlu+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: õlledenagi
      õlu+N+Pl+Trm: õlledeni
      õlu+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: õlledenigi
      õlu+N+Pl+Tra: õlledeks
      õlu+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: õlledekski
      õlu+N+Pl+Abl: õlledelt
      õlu+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: õlledeltki
      õlu+N+Pl+Ade: õlledel
      õlu+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: õlledelgi
      õlu+N+Pl+All: õlledele
      õlu+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: õlledelegi
      õlu+N+Pl+Ela: õlledest
      õlu+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: õlledestki
      õlu+N+Pl+Ine: õlledes
      õlu+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: õlledeski
      õlu+N+Pl+Ill: õlledesse
      õlu+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: õlledessegi
      õlu+N+Pl+Gen: õllede
      õlu+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: õlledegi
      õlu+N+Pl+Par: õllesid
      õlu+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: õllesidki
      õlu+N+Sg+Ill: õllesse
      õlu+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: õllessegi
      õlu+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: õlusidki
      õlu+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: õlusid
      õlu+N+Sg+Nom: õlu
      õlu+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: õlugi
      õlu+N+Sg+Par: õlut
      õlu+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: õlutki
      öö+N+Pl+Par: öid
      öö+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: öidki
      öö+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öhegi
      öö+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: öhe
      öö+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: öiks
      öö+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öikski
      öö+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: öilt
      öö+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öiltki
      öö+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: öil
      öö+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öilgi
      öö+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: öile
      öö+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öilegi
      öö+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: öist
      öö+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öistki
      öö+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: öis
      öö+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öiski
      öö+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: öisse
      öö+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öissegi
      öö+N+Sg+Com: ööga
      öö+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: öögagi
      öö+N+Sg+Abe: ööta
      öö+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: öötagi
      öö+N+Sg+Ess: ööna
      öö+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: öönagi
      öö+N+Sg+Trm: ööni
      öö+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: öönigi
      öö+N+Sg+Tra: ööks
      öö+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: öökski
      öö+N+Sg+Abl: öölt
      öö+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: ööltki
      öö+N+Sg+Ade: ööl
      öö+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: öölgi
      öö+N+Sg+All: ööle
      öö+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: öölegi
      öö+N+Sg+Ela: ööst
      öö+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: ööstki
      öö+N+Sg+Ine: öös
      öö+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: ööski
      öö+N+Sg+Ill: öösse
      öö+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: öössegi
      öö+N+Sg+Gen: öö
      öö+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: öögi
      öö+N+Sg+Nom: öö
      öö+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: öögi
      öö+N+Sg+Par: ööd
      öö+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: öödki
      öö+N+Pl+Nom: ööd
      öö+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: öödki
      öö+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: öösidki
      öö+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: öösid
      öö+N+Pl+Com: öödega
      öö+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: öödegagi
      öö+N+Pl+Abe: öödeta
      öö+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: öödetagi
      öö+N+Pl+Ess: öödena
      öö+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: öödenagi
      öö+N+Pl+Trm: öödeni
      öö+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: öödenigi
      öö+N+Pl+Tra: öödeks
      öö+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: öödekski
      öö+N+Pl+Abl: öödelt
      öö+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: öödeltki
      öö+N+Pl+Ade: öödel
      öö+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: öödelgi
      öö+N+Pl+All: öödele
      öö+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: öödelegi
      öö+N+Pl+Ela: öödest
      öö+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: öödestki
      öö+N+Pl+Ine: öödes
      öö+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: öödeski
      öö+N+Pl+Ill: öödesse
      öö+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: öödessegi
      öö+N+Pl+Gen: ööde
      öö+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: öödegi
